Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1314
Failing to observe a blind person; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of failing to observe a blind person if as an operator of any vehicle or other conveyance, he fails to:

(a) Give special consideration to the bearer of a white cane or user of a guide dog; and

(b) Stop and remain when approaching such bearer until such time as the bearer has safely reached a position well outside the course normally used by the operator of the vehicle or other conveyance.

(2) Failure to observe a blind person is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 298.